California statutes. Insurance Code
(p) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 10123.13 and 10123.147, an insurer may delay payment or reimbursement owed to a provider or provider group for any claims payment made to a provider or provider group for up to one calendar month beginning on the first day of the following
 month, if the provider or provider group fails to respond to the insurer’s attempts to verify the provider’s information as required under subdivision (l). The insurer shall not delay payment unless it has attempted to verify the provider’s or provider group’s information. As used in this subdivision, “verify” means to contact the provider or provider group in writing, electronically, and by telephone to confirm whether the provider’s or provider group’s information is correct or requires updates. An insurer may seek to delay payment or reimbursement owed to a provider or provider group only after the 10-business day notice period described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (l) has lapsed.

(2) An insurer shall notify the provider or provider group 10 days before it seeks to delay payment or reimbursement to a provider or provider group pursuant
 to this subdivision. If the insurer delays a payment or reimbursement pursuant to this subdivision, the insurer shall reimburse the full amount of any payment or reimbursement subject to delay to the provider or provider group according to either of the following timelines, as applicable:

(A) No later than three business days following the date on which the insurer receives the information required to be submitted by the provider or provider group pursuant to subdivision (l).

(B) At the end of the one-calendar-month delay described in paragraph (1), if the provider or provider group fails to provide the information required to be submitted to the insurer pursuant to subdivision (l).

(3) An insurer may terminate a
 contract for a pattern or repeated failure of the provider or provider group to alert the insurer to a change in the information required to be in the directory or directories pursuant to this section.

(4) An insurer that delays payment or reimbursement under this subdivision shall document each instance a payment or reimbursement was delayed and report this information to the department in a format described by the department. This information shall be submitted along with the policies and procedures required to be submitted annually to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (m).

(q) In circumstances where the department finds that an insured reasonably relied upon materially inaccurate, incomplete, or misleading information contained in an insurer’s provider
 directory or directories, the department may require the insurer to provide coverage for all covered health care services provided to the insured and to reimburse the insured for any amount beyond what the insured would have paid, had the services been delivered by an in-network provider under the insured’s health insurance policy. Prior to requiring reimbursement in these circumstances, the department shall conclude that the services received by the insured were covered services under the insured’s health insurance policy. In those circumstances, the fact that the services were rendered or delivered by a noncontracting or out-of-network provider shall not be used as a basis to deny reimbursement to the insured.

(r) Whenever an insurer determines as a result of this section that there has been a 10-percent change in the network for a product in
 a region, the insurer shall file a statement with the commissioner.

(s) An insurer that contracts with multiple employer welfare agreements regulated pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 742.20) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 shall meet the requirements of this section.

(t) This section shall not be construed to alter a provider’s obligation to provide health care services to an insured pursuant to the provider’s contract with the insurer.

(u) As part of the department’s routine examination of a health insurer pursuant to Section 730, the department shall include a review of the health insurer’s compliance with subdivision (p).

(v) For purposes of
 this section, “provider group” means a medical group, independent practice association, or other similar group of providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 413, Sec. 6.   (SB 402)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.2.

When any disability insurer negotiates and enters into a contract with professional or institutional providers to provide services at alternative rates of payment of the type described in Sections 10133 and 11512 of the Insurance Code, the amount of patient copayment shall be calculated exclusively from the negotiated alternative rate for the service rendered. No disability insurer or professional or institutional provider, negotiating and entering into a contract pursuant to this section, shall charge or collect copayment amounts greater than those calculated in accordance with this section.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.3.

When any self-insured governmental plan, as defined in Section 12671, negotiates and enters into a contract with professional or institutional providers to provide services at alternative rates of payment of the type described in Sections 10133 and 11512 of the Insurance Code, the amount of patient copayment shall be calculated exclusively from the negotiated alternative rate for the service rendered. No self-insured governmental plan or professional or institutional provider, negotiating and entering into a contract pursuant to this section, shall charge or collect copayment amounts greater than those calculated in accordance with this section.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.4.

(a) For purposes of insurers that contract with providers for alternate rates pursuant to Section 10133, a primary care provider includes a “nonphysician medical practitioner,” which is defined as a physician assistant performing services under the supervision of a primary care physician in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code or a nurse practitioner performing services in collaboration with a physician pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) This section shall not require a primary care provider to accept the assignment of a number of insureds that would exceed standards of good
 health care as provided in Section 10133.5.

(c) This section shall not be interpreted to modify subdivision (e) of Section 2836.1 of the Business and Professions Code or subdivision (b) of Section 3516 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 100.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.5.

(a) The commissioner shall, on or before January 1, 2004, promulgate regulations applicable to health insurers which contract with providers for alternative rates pursuant to Section 10133 to ensure that insureds have the opportunity to access needed health care services in a timely manner.

(b) These regulations shall be designed to assure accessibility of provider services in a timely manner to individuals comprising the insured or contracted group, pursuant to benefits covered under the policy or contract. The regulations shall insure:

1.Adequacy of number and locations of institutional facilities and professional providers, and consultants in relationship to the size and location of the insured group and that the services offered are available at reasonable times.

2.Adequacy of number of professional providers, and license classifications of such providers, in relationship to the projected demands for services covered under the group policy or plan. The department shall consider the nature of the specialty in determining the adequacy of professional providers.

3.The policy or contract is not inconsistent with standards of good health care and clinically appropriate care.

4. All contracts including contracts with providers, and other persons furnishing services, or facilities shall be fair and reasonable.

(c) In developing standards under subdivision (a), the department shall also consider requirements under federal law; requirements under other state programs and law, including utilization review; and standards adopted by other states, national accrediting organizations and professional associations. The department shall further consider the accessability to provider services in rural areas.

(d) In designing the regulations the commissioner shall consider the regulations in Title 28, of the California Administrative Code of Regulations, commencing with Section 1300.67.2, which are applicable to Knox-Keene plans, and all other relevant guidelines in an effort to accomplish maximum accessibility within a cost efficient system of indemnification. The department shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care concerning regulations developed by that department pursuant to Section 1367.03 of the Health and Safety Code and shall seek public input from a wide range of interested parties.

(e) Health insurers that contract for alternative rates of payment with providers shall report annually on complaints received by the insurer regarding timely access to care. The department shall review these complaints and any complaints received by the department regarding timeliness of care and shall make public this information.

(f) The department shall report to the Assembly Committee on Health and the Senate Committee on Insurance of the Legislature on March 1, 2003, and on March 1, 2004, regarding the progress towards the implementation of this section.

(g) Every three years, the commissioner shall review the latest version of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall determine if the regulations should be updated to further the intent of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 797, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.52.

(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the department shall issue instructions to health insurers to report all covered health care services subject to prior authorization, the percentage rate at which they are approved or modified by the health insurer or its delegated entity, and other statistics regarding prior authorization determinations as determined by the department. These instructions shall include a standard reporting template.

(b) (1) On or before December 31, 2026, a health insurer shall report to the department, in accordance with the instructions issued pursuant to subdivision (a), the covered health care services subject to prior
 authorization, the percentage rate at which they are approved or modified by the health insurer or its delegated entity, data regarding requested or authorized duration, frequency, or level of care of the health care services, and other statistics regarding prior authorization determinations pursuant to subdivision (a). Data regarding modifications shall be reported separately from approvals in accordance with the instructions issued pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) If a health insurer delegates responsibility for decisions regarding prior authorization requests to another entity, the health insurer shall obtain information required to be reported by this section from each delegated entity and include that information in the health insurer’s report to the department. A health insurer shall require a delegated entity to comply with a request
 made pursuant to this paragraph.

(c) (1) The department shall evaluate the reports received pursuant to this section and identify the health care services approved by health insurers or their delegated entities at a rate that meets or exceeds the threshold rate of 90 percent. For purposes of this
 paragraph, “approved” may also include modified requests for the purpose of calculating the threshold rate as the department determines appropriate.

(2) The department may consider all of the following factors when determining the appropriateness of removing prior authorization for a specific covered health care service, regardless of its approval percentage rate:

(A) Utilization of a health care service in a manner inconsistent with current clinical practice guidelines published in peer-reviewed medical literature or
 United States Food and Drug Administration-approved indications, as applicable.

(B) The potential for fraud, waste, and abuse.

(C) The potential for cost savings from eliminating prior
 authorization, including out-of-pocket cost savings to the insured.

(D) The potential for improvements in quality of care, health care outcomes, and timely access to care for insureds from eliminating prior authorization.

(E) Other factors deemed appropriate by the department.

(3) Before finalizing the list of covered health care services pursuant to this section, the department shall consult interested stakeholders.

(4) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall publish the list of covered health care services identified pursuant to paragraph (1). As of the date specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5), a health insurer shall not impose
 prior authorization on a covered health care service included on the list published by the department pursuant to this paragraph.

(5) The department shall issue instructions to health insurers regarding all of the following:

(A) The date, which shall be no later than January 1, 2028, by which the health insurer and its delegated entities shall cease requiring prior authorization for the covered health care services identified pursuant to this subdivision. When issuing the date by which a health insurer and its delegated entities shall cease requiring prior authorization pursuant to this section, the department shall take into consideration the time necessary for insurers to update their policies.

(B) Requirements
 for notifying providers of the change in prior authorization requirements.

(C) The process by which a health insurer may petition the
 department to reinstate the ability of the health insurer to use prior authorization for a particular covered health care service upon a showing of good cause that a lack of prior authorization for the covered health care service has resulted in a demonstrable increase in the cost of care or decrease in the quality of care for the health insurer’s insureds, including fraud, waste, or abuse. The department determination on a petition pursuant to this subparagraph shall be made within 60 days of receipt of all information necessary for the department to issue a decision on the petition. A health insurer shall not reinstate prior authorization for a covered health care service subject to this section until authorized by the department and in accordance with any other law, as applicable.

(6) The department may issue other instructions it
 deems necessary and appropriate to implement this section.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a health insurer may impose prior authorization on any of the following:

(1) Outpatient prescription drugs in tier three or four of a health insurer’s formulary, as those tiers are defined in Section 10123.1932.

(2) A drug or medical device prescribed or recommended for a use that is different from the use for which the drug or medical device has been cleared or approved for marketing by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(3) A covered health care service that is experimental or investigational, excluding services for which there is medical or scientific
 evidence, as defined in Section 10145.3.

(4) A covered health care service that is prescribed or recommended for a use that is a novel application of an existing therapy or technology, excluding uses for which there is medical or scientific evidence, as defined in Section 10145.3.

(5) A covered health care service requested, ordered, prescribed, delivered, furnished, or dispensed by an out-of-network or noncontracting provider.

(e) A covered health care service that is exempted from prior authorization pursuant to this section constitutes a service authorized
 by the health insurer for purposes of Section 796.04. A health insurer or its delegated entity shall not deny or reduce the contracted or agreed upon payment, or the applicable rate or reimbursement methodology specified in a policy, for a covered health care service exempted from a prior authorization requirement pursuant to this section unless the provider failed to substantially perform or supply the covered health care service.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a health insurer may, in accordance with any other applicable law, reinstate prior authorization for a specific health care provider on a covered health care service for which prior authorization is otherwise prohibited pursuant to subdivision (c) only if the health insurer has determined, based on clear and convincing evidence, that the health care provider has engaged in
 either of the following:

(1) Fraudulent activity related to the provision or billing of health care services.

(2) Pattern or practice of repeatedly providing care that is clinically inappropriate or inconsistent with generally accepted standards of care, and that results in either potential harm to patients or excessive utilization of health care resources inconsistent with generally accepted standards of care.

(g) (1) The department may contract with a consultant or consultants with expertise in this subject area to assist the department in implementing this section, including developing instructions described in subdivision (a), evaluating the reports received by the department pursuant to subdivision
 (b), developing and publishing a list pursuant to subdivision (c), developing other implementation instructions, and drafting the report required pursuant to this section.

(2) The department’s contract with a consultant shall include conflict-of-interest provisions to prohibit a person from participating in a report in which the person knows or has reason to know they have a material financial interest, including a person who has a consulting or other agreement with a person or organization that would be affected by the results of the report.

(3) Contracts entered into pursuant to this subdivision are exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with
 Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(h) No later than four years after the date determined by the department for cessation of prior authorization requirements pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c), the department shall publish a report regarding the impacts of the cessation of prior authorization requirements. A health insurer shall report information and data regarding the impacts of implementing this section, including effects on the volume of covered health care services subjected to prior authorization, statistics on prior authorization requests and determinations, administrative costs, timely access to care, insured health outcomes, and data on reinstatements of prior
 authorization pursuant to subdivision (f), to be included in this report.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of bulletins, methodologies, rules, definitions, policies, forms, information or data requests, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action, until this section is repealed.

(2) The department shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care before issuing instructions and the list of covered
 health care services for which prior authorization is prohibited, pursuant to this section, to ensure consistency to the extent practical.

(j) This section does not apply to a specialized health insurer, except to the extent the insurer provides or administers essential health benefits pursuant to health insurance policies or certificates subject to Section 10112.27.

(k) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Covered health care service” means a health care item, product, drug, supply, procedure, treatment, or service covered by a health insurance policy or certificate.

(2) “Prior authorization” means the process by which utilization review determines
 the medical necessity or medical appropriateness of otherwise covered health care services prior to or concurrent with the rendering of those health care services. “Prior authorization” also includes an insurer’s or its delegated entity’s requirement that an insured or health care provider notify the health insurer before providing a health care service, including preauthorization, precertification, and prior approval.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 408, Sec. 2.   (SB 306)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.53.

(a) (1) A health insurance policy that is issued, renewed, or amended on or after July 1, 2017, that provides benefits through contracts with providers for alternative rates pursuant to Section 10133 shall provide information to an insured regarding the standards for timely access to care adopted pursuant to Section 10133.5 and the information required by this section, including information related to receipt of interpreter services in a timely manner, no less than annually.

(2) A health insurance policy that is issued, renewed, or amended on or after July 1, 2022, that provides benefits through contracts with providers for alternative rates pursuant to Section
 10133 shall provide information to an insured regarding the standards for timely access to care required by Section 10133.54, adopted pursuant to Section 10133.5, and the information required by this section, including information related to receipt of interpreter services in a timely manner, no less than annually.

(b) A health insurer that contracts with providers for alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133 shall, at a minimum, provide information regarding appointment wait times for urgent care, nonurgent primary care, nonurgent specialty care, and telephone screening established in Section 10133.54 or pursuant to Section 10133.5 to insureds and contracting providers. The information shall also include notice of the availability of interpreter services at the time of the appointment pursuant to Section 10133.8. A
 health insurer may indicate that exceptions to appointment wait times may apply if the department has found exceptions to be permissible.

(c) The information required to be provided pursuant to this section shall be provided to an insured with individual coverage upon initial enrollment and annually thereafter upon renewal, and to insureds and group policyholders with group coverage upon initial enrollment and annually thereafter upon renewal. An insurer may include this information with other materials sent to the insured. The information shall also be provided in the following manner:

(1) In a separate section of the evidence of coverage titled “Timely Access to Care.”

(2) At least annually, in or with
 newsletters, outreach, or other materials that are routinely disseminated to the policy’s insureds.

(3) Commencing January 1, 2018, in a separate section of the provider directory published and maintained by the insurer pursuant to Section 10133.15. The separate section shall be titled “Timely Access to Care.”

(4) On the internet website published and maintained by the insurer, in a manner that allows insureds and prospective insureds to easily locate the information.

(d) (1) A health insurer shall provide the information required by this section to contracting providers on no less than an annual basis.

(2) A health insurer shall also
 inform a contracting provider of all of the following:

(A) Information about a health insurer’s obligation under California law to provide or arrange for timely access to care.

(B) How a contracting provider or insured can contact the health insurer to obtain assistance if a patient is unable to obtain a timely referral to an appropriate provider.

(C) The toll-free telephone number for the Department of Insurance where providers and insureds can file a complaint if they are unable to obtain a timely referral to an appropriate provider.

(3) A health insurer may comply with this subdivision by including the information with an existing
 communication with a contracting provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 724, Sec. 4.   (SB 221)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10133.54.

(a) This section applies to policies of health insurance, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 106. The requirements of this section apply to all health care services covered by a health insurance policy.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 10133.5, a health insurer shall comply with the timely access requirements in this section, but a specialized health insurance policy as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 106, other than a specialized mental health insurance policy, is exempt from the provisions of this section, except as specified in paragraph (6) and subdivision (c).

(1) A health insurer shall provide or arrange for
 the provision of covered health care services in a timely manner appropriate for the nature of the insured’s condition, consistent with good professional practice. An insurer shall establish and maintain provider networks, policies, procedures, and quality assurance monitoring systems and processes sufficient to ensure compliance with this clinical appropriateness standard. An insurer that uses a tiered network shall demonstrate compliance with the standards established by this section based on providers available at the lowest cost-sharing tier.

(2) A health insurer shall ensure that all insurer and provider processes necessary to obtain covered health care services, including, but not limited to, prior authorization processes, are completed in a manner that assures the provision of covered health care services to an insured in a
 timely manner appropriate for the insured’s condition and in compliance with this section.

(3) If it is necessary for a provider or an insured to reschedule an appointment, the appointment shall be promptly rescheduled in a manner that is appropriate for the insured’s health care needs, and ensures continuity of care consistent with good professional practice, and consistent with the objectives of Section 10133.5, the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 10133.5, and this section.

(4) Interpreter services required by Section 10133.8 of this code and Article 12.1 (commencing with Section 2538.1) of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations shall be coordinated with scheduled appointments for health care services in a manner that ensures the provision of interpreter
 services at the time of the appointment, consistent with Section 2538.6 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, without imposing delay on the scheduling of the appointment. This subdivision does not modify the requirements established in Sections 10133.8 and 10133.9 of this code and Section 2538.6 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, or approved by the department pursuant to Section 2538.6 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations for an insurer’s language assistance program.

(5) In addition to ensuring compliance with the clinical appropriateness standard set forth in paragraph (1), a health insurer shall ensure that its contracted provider network has adequate capacity and availability of licensed health care providers to offer insureds appointments that meet the following timeframes:

(A) Urgent care appointments for services that do not require prior authorization: within 48 hours of the request for appointment, except as provided in subparagraph (H).

(B) Urgent care appointments for services that require prior authorization: within 96 hours of the request for appointment, except as provided in subparagraph (H).

(C) Nonurgent appointments for primary care: within 10 business days of the request for appointment, except as provided in subparagraphs (H) and (I).

(D) Nonurgent appointments with specialist physicians: within 15 business days of the request for appointment, except as provided in subparagraphs (H) and (I).

(E) Nonurgent appointments with a nonphysician mental health care or substance use disorder provider: within 10 business days of the request for appointment, except as provided in subparagraphs (H) and (I).

(F) Commencing July 1, 2022, nonurgent followup appointments with a nonphysician mental health care or substance use disorder provider: within 10 business days of the prior appointment for
 those undergoing a course of treatment for an ongoing mental health or substance use disorder condition, except as provided in subparagraph (H). This subparagraph does not limit coverage for nonurgent followup appointments with a nonphysician mental health care or substance use disorder provider to once every 10 business days.

(G) Nonurgent appointments for ancillary services for the diagnosis or treatment of injury, illness, or other health condition: within 15 business days of the request for appointment, except as provided in subparagraphs (H) and (I).

(H) The applicable waiting time for a particular appointment may be extended if the referring or treating licensed health care provider, or the health professional providing triage or screening services, as
 applicable, acting within the scope of their practice and consistent with professionally recognized standards of practice,
 has determined and noted in the relevant record that a longer waiting time will not have a detrimental impact on the health of the insured.

(I) Preventive care services, as defined in subdivision (e), and periodic follow up care, including standing referrals to specialists for chronic conditions, periodic office visits to monitor and treat pregnancy, cardiac, mental health, or substance use disorder conditions, and laboratory and radiological monitoring for recurrence of disease, may be scheduled in advance consistent with professionally recognized standards of practice as determined by the treating licensed health care provider acting within the scope of their practice.

(J) A referral to a specialist by a primary care provider or another specialist shall be
 subject to the relevant time-elapsed standard in subparagraph (A), (B) or (D), unless the requirements in subparagraph (H) or (I) are met, and shall be subject to the other provisions of this section.

(6) (A) The following types of health insurance policies shall be subject to the requirements in subparagraph (B):

(i) A health insurance policy covering the pediatric oral or vision essential health benefit.

(ii) A specialized health insurance policy that provides coverage for the pediatric oral essential health benefit, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 10112.27.

(iii) A specialized health insurance policy that
 covers dental benefits only, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 106.

(B) In addition to ensuring compliance with the clinical appropriateness standard set forth in paragraph (1), each health insurance policy specified in subparagraph (A) shall ensure that contracted oral or vision provider networks have adequate capacity and availability of licensed health care providers, including generalist and specialist dentists, ophthalmologists, optometrists, and opticians, to offer insureds appointments for covered oral or vision services in accordance with the following requirements:

(i) Urgent appointments within the plan network shall be offered within 72 hours of the time of request for appointment, if consistent with the insured’s individual needs and as required by professionally
 recognized standards of dental practice.

(ii) Nonurgent appointments shall be offered within 36 business days of the request for appointment, except as provided in clause (iii).

(iii) Preventive care appointments shall be offered within 40 business days of the request for appointment.

(iv) The applicable waiting time for a particular appointment in this paragraph may be extended if the referring or treating licensed health care provider, or the health professional providing triage or screening services, as applicable, acting within the scope of the provider’s practice and consistent with professionally recognized standards of practice, has determined and noted in the relevant record that a longer waiting time will not have
 a detrimental impact on the health of the insured.

(7) An insurer shall ensure it has sufficient numbers of contracted providers to maintain compliance with the standards established by this section.

(A) This section does not modify the requirements regarding
 accessibility established by Article 6 (commencing with Section 2240) of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) An insurer shall ensure timely access to covered health care services as required by this section, including applicable time-elapsed standards, by assisting an insured to locate available and accessible contracted providers in a timely manner appropriate for the insured’s health needs. An insurer shall arrange for the provision of services outside the insurer’s contracted network if unavailable within the network if medically necessary for the insured’s condition. Insured costs for medically necessary referrals to nonnetwork providers shall not exceed applicable in-network copayments, coinsurance, and deductibles.

(8) An insurer shall provide
 or arrange for the provision, 24 hours per day, 7 days per week, of triage or screening services by telephone, as defined in subdivision (f).

(A) An insurer shall ensure that telephone triage or screening services are provided in a timely manner appropriate for the insured’s condition, and that the triage or screening waiting time does not exceed 30 minutes.

(B) An insurer may provide or arrange for the provision of telephone triage or screening services through one or more of the following means: insurer-operated telephone triage or screening services, telephone medical advice services pursuant to Section 10279, the insurer’s contracted primary care and mental health care or substance use disorder provider network, or other method that provides triage or screening services
 consistent with this section.

(i) An insurer that arranges for the provision of telephone triage or screening services through contracted primary care and mental health care and substance use disorder providers shall require those providers to maintain a procedure for triaging or screening insured telephone calls, which, at a minimum, shall include the employment, during and after business hours, of a telephone answering machine, an answering service, or office staff, that shall inform the caller of both of the following:

(I) Regarding the length of wait for a return call from the provider.

(II) How the caller may obtain urgent or emergency care, including, if applicable, how to contact another provider who has agreed
 to be on call to triage or screen by phone, or if needed, deliver urgent or emergency care.

(ii) An insurer that arranges for the provision of triage or screening services through contracted primary care and mental health care and substance use disorder providers who are unable to meet the time-elapsed standards established in subparagraph (A) shall also provide or arrange for the provision of insurer-contracted or operated triage or screening services, which shall, at a minimum, be made available to insureds affected by that portion of the insurer’s network.

(iii) An unlicensed staff person handling insured calls may ask questions on behalf of a licensed staff person to help ascertain the condition of an insured so that the insured may be referred to licensed staff.
 However, an unlicensed staff person shall not, under any circumstances, use the answers to those questions in an attempt to assess, evaluate, advise, or make a decision regarding the condition of an insured or determine when an insured needs to be seen by a licensed medical professional.

(9) A health insurance policy providing coverage for the pediatric oral and vision essential health benefit, and a specialized health insurance policy that provides coverage for dental care expenses only, shall require that contracted providers employ an answering service or a telephone answering machine during nonbusiness hours, which provides instructions regarding how an insured may obtain urgent or emergency care, including, if applicable, how to contact another provider who has agreed to be on call to triage or screen by phone, or if needed, deliver urgent or
 emergency care.

(10) An insurer shall ensure that, during normal business hours, the waiting time for an insured to speak by telephone with an insurer customer service representative knowledgeable and competent regarding the insured’s questions and concerns shall not exceed 10 minutes, or that the covered person will receive a scheduled call-back within 30 minutes.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a specialized health insurance policy, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 106, other than a specialized mental health insurance policy, is exempt from this section, except as specified in this subdivision. A specialized health insurance policy that provides coverage for dental care expenses only shall comply with paragraphs (1), (3), (4), (6), (7), (9), and (10) of
 subdivision (b).

(d) An insurer shall incorporate the standards set forth in the insurer’s quality assurance systems and processes, as set forth in subdivision (b), and the processes as set forth in Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, including Sections 2240.1, 2240.15, and 2240.16. An insurer shall not prevent, discourage, or discipline a contracting provider or employee for informing an insured or policyholder about the timely access standards.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Appointment waiting time” means the time from the
 initial request for health care services by an insured or the insured’s treating provider to the earliest date offered for the appointment for services inclusive of time for obtaining authorization from the insurer or completing any other condition or requirement of the insurer or its contracting providers.

(2) “Preventive care” means health care provided for prevention and early detection of disease, illness, injury, or other health condition and includes, but is not limited to, all of the services required by all of the following laws:

(A) Section 146.130 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Section 10112.2 (incorporating the requirements of Section 2713 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C.
 Sec. 300gg-13)).

(C) Clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10112.27.

(3) “Provider group” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (v) of Section 10133.15.
